Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 80. Liability of the State.

Sec. 44.80.010.
State as a party to actions.

If a statute or regulation designates a state department, agency, board, commission, or public officer as a necessary or proper party to prosecute or defend an action in a court of the state,

the state is also a proper party to the action;

it is not necessary to name a department, agency, board, commission, or public officer as an additional party to the action; and

the Department of Law may bring, prosecute, or defend the action in any court in the name of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1961)

Cross references. —

For actionable claims against the state, see AS

09.50.250

—

09.50.300

; for administrative presentation of claims against the state, see AS 44.77.

Secs. 44.80.020 — 44.80.050.
Federal Construction of Flood Control Projects. [Repealed, § 1 ch 77 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 44.80.070.
Liability of state under special use permits.

When the state, or a department or agency of the state that has control over a highway or vehicular way or area, permits a portion of the highway or vehicular way or area, as defined under AS

28.90.990

, to be used for a special purpose, the state is not subject to legal action or recovery of damages for injury arising out of, or in any manner connected with the special purpose use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 65 SLA 1965; am § 19 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 144 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Cross references. —

For permits for special racing events on highways, see AS

05.90.001

.